Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1982.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1024.1, as


last amended by Section 4, Chapter 29, O.S.L. 2025 (21 O.S. Supp.


2025, Section 1024.1), is amended to read as follows:


Section 1024.1. A. As used in Sections 1021, 1021.1 through


1021.4, Sections 1022, 1023, and Sections 1040.8 through 1040.24 of


this title, “child sexual abuse material” means:

Req. No. 3485 Page 1


1. Any visual depiction of a child engaged in any act of


sexually explicit conduct;


2. Any visual depiction of a child that has been adapted,


altered, or modified so that the child depicted appears to be


engaged in any act of sexually explicit conduct; or


3. Any visual depiction that appears to be a child, regardless


of whether the image is a depiction of an actual child, a computer-


generated image, or an image altered to appear to be a child,


engaged in any act of sexually explicit conduct, and such visual


depiction is obscene.


B. Each visual depiction or individual image of child


pornography shall constitute a separate item and act.


C. As used in Sections 1021 through 1024.4 and Sections 1040.8


through 1040.24 of this title:


1. “Child” means a person under eighteen (18) years of age;


2. “Obscene” means any performance or depiction, in any form or


on any medium, if the material when taken as a whole:


a. appeals to the prurient interest in sex as determined


by the average person applying the contemporary


standards of their his or her community,


b. depicts, represents, or displays sexually explicit


conduct in a patently offensive way, and





Req. No. 3485 Page 2


c. a reasonable person would find the material or


performance lacks serious literary, artistic,


educational, political, or scientific value;


3. “Performance” means any display, live, recorded, or


transmitted, in any form or medium;


4. “Sexually explicit conduct” means any of the following


whether actual or simulated:


a. acts of sexual intercourse,


b. acts of oral and anal sodomy,


c. acts of masturbation,


d. acts of sexual activity with an animal,


e. acts of sadomasochism including:


(1) flagellation or torture by or upon any person who


is nude or clad in undergarments or in a costume


which is of a revealing nature, or


(2) the condition of being fettered, bound, or


otherwise physically restrained on the part of


one who is nude or so clothed,


f. acts of excretion in a sexual context, or


g. exhibiting genitalia, breast, or pubic area for the


purpose of the sexual stimulation of the viewer;


5. “Explicit child sexual abuse material” means material which


a law enforcement officer can immediately identify as child sexual


abuse material; and

Req. No. 3485 Page 3


6. “Unlawful pornography” means any visual depiction or


individual image stored or contained in any format on any medium


including, but not limited to, film, motion picture, videotape,


photograph, negative, undeveloped film, slide, photographic product,


reproduction of a photographic product, play, or performance in


which a person is engaged in any of the following acts with a


person:


a. sexual intercourse which is normal or perverted,


b. anal sodomy,


c. sexual activity with an animal,


d. sadomasochistic abuse,


e. flagellation or torture,


f. physical restraint such as binding or fettering in the


context of sexual conduct,


g. fellatio or cunnilingus,


h. excretion in the context of sexual conduct,


i. lewd exhibition of the uncovered genitals in the


context of masturbation or other sexual conduct, and


j. lewd exhibition of the uncovered genitals, buttocks,


or, if such person is female, the breast, for the


purpose of sexual stimulation of the viewer; and


7. “Visual depiction” means any depiction, picture, movie,


performance, or image displayed, stored, shared, or transmitted in



Req. No. 3485 Page 4


any format and on any medium including data that is capable of being


converted into a depiction, picture, movie, performance, or image.


D. It is the intent of the Legislature that every provision,


section, subsection, sentence, clause, phrase, or word in the


definition of unlawful pornography is severable from each other,


such that if any of the listed items is found by a court to be


invalid or unconstitutional, the remaining items will be severed and


may not be affected. All constitutionally valid applications of


this section shall be severed from any application that a court


finds to be invalid, leaving the valid applications in force,


because it is the intent and priority of the Legislature that the


valid applications be allowed to stand alone. Even if a reviewing


court finds a provision of this section to be an unconstitutional


restraint in a large or substantial fraction of relevant cases, the


applications that do not present an unconstitutional restraint shall


be severed from the remaining applications and shall remain in


force, and shall be treated as if the Legislature had enacted a


statute limited to the person, group of persons, or circumstances


for which the application of the statute does not present an


unconstitutional restraint on protected speech. If any court


declares or finds a provision of this section facially


unconstitutional, when discrete applications of that provision can


be enforced against a persons, group of persons, or circumstances


without violating the United States Constitution and Oklahoma

Req. No. 3485 Page 5


Constitution, those applications shall be severed from all remaining


applications of the provision, and the provision shall be


interpreted as if the Legislature had enacted a provision limited to


the person, group of persons, or circumstances for which the


provision’s application will not violate the United States


Constitution and Oklahoma Constitution.


E. The Legislature further declares that it would have enacted


this section, and each provision, subsection, sentence, clause,


phrase, or word, and all constitutional applications of this


section, irrespective of the fact that any provision, subsection,


sentence, clause, phrase, or word, or application of this section,


were to be declared unconstitutional or to represent an


unconstitutional restraint. If any provision of this section is


found by any court to be unconstitutionally vague, then the


applications of that provision that do not present constitutional


vagueness problems shall be severed and remain in force. No court


may decline to enforce the severability requirements of this section


on the grounds that severance would rewrite the statute or involve


the court in legislative or lawmaking activity.


F. Each of the items of unlawful pornography in paragraph 6 of


subsection C of this section are depictions of sexual conduct which


are patently offensive under contemporary community standards in


this state, and have as their dominant theme an appeal to prurient


interest in sex under contemporary community standards of this

Req. No. 3485 Page 6


state, and may not be produced or distributed within the state if


they lack serious literary, artistic, educational, political, or


scientific purposes or value.


G. Any person, other than an officer or employee of a state or


local governmental entity in this state, may bring a civil action


against any person who:


1. Produces or distributes unlawful pornography that lacks


serious literary, artistic, educational, political, or scientific


purposes or value;


2. Knowingly engages in conduct that aids or abets the


production or distribution of unlawful pornography that lacks


serious literary, artistic, educational, political, or scientific


purposes or value; or


3. Intends to engage in the conduct provided for in paragraphs


and 2 of this subsection.


H. If a claimant prevails in an action brought under this


section, the court shall award:


1. Injunctive relief sufficient to prevent the defendant from


violating this section or engaging in acts that aid or abet


violations of this section;


2. Statutory damages not less than Ten Thousand Dollars


($10,000.00) for each image or depiction produced or distributed


within this state; and


3. Court costs and attorney fees.

Req. No. 3485 Page 7


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1024.2, as


last amended by Section 51, Chapter 486, O.S.L. 2025 (21 O.S. Supp.


2025, Section 1024.2), is amended to read as follows:


Section 1024.2. A. It shall be unlawful for any person to buy,


procure, view, traffic, or possess child sexual abuse material as


defined in violation of Sections Section 1024.1 through 1024.4 of


this title. Such


B. 1. A person who violates subsection A of this section


shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a Class B1 felony offense and


shall be punished by imprisonment for a period of not more less than


twenty (20) ten (10) years or nor more than thirty (30) years, and a


fine up to, but not exceeding, Twenty-five Thousand Dollars


($25,000.00) or by both such fine and imprisonment not to exceed Two


Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($250,000.00). A person who receives


a second or subsequent conviction pursuant to this subsection shall


be punished by imprisonment in the custody of the Department of


Corrections for not less than fifteen (15) years nor more than fifty


(50) years, and a fine not to exceed Three Hundred Thousand Dollars


($300,000.00).


2. For purposes of this section, “trafficking pornography”


means the production, sale, distribution, transportation, or


dissemination of pornography through any medium, including physical


or electronic means, for financial or material gain or with intent


to exploit.

Req. No. 3485 Page 8


a. Trafficking of child sexual abuse material or unlawful


pornography conducted through organized operations


shall be punishable by imprisonment in the custody of


the Department of Corrections for a term not more than


forty (40) years nor less than fifteen (15) years, and


a fine not to exceed Five Hundred Thousand Dollars


($500,000.00).


b. Victims of trafficking offenses may recover statutory


damages not less than Fifty Thousand Dollars


($50,000.00) per occurrence, attorney fees, and


injunctive relief.


This section shall not be construed to prevent spouses from


sending images of a sexual nature to each other.


SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1040.8, as


last amended by Section 72, Chapter 486, O.S.L. 2025 (21 O.S. Supp.


2025, Section 1040.8), is amended to read as follows:


Section 1040.8. A. No person shall knowingly photograph, act


in, pose for, model for, print, sell, offer for sale, give away,


exhibit, publish, offer to publish, or otherwise distribute,


display, or exhibit any book, magazine, story, pamphlet, paper,


writing, card, advertisement, circular, print, picture, photograph,


motion picture film, electronic video game or recording, image,


cast, slide, figure, instrument, statue, drawing, presentation, or


other article which is obscene material, unlawful pornography, or

Req. No. 3485 Page 9


child sexual abuse material, as defined in Section 1024.1 of this


title. In the case of any unsolicited mailing of any of the


material listed in this section, the offense is deemed complete from


the time such material is deposited in any post office or delivered


to any person with intent that it shall be forwarded. Also, unless


preempted by federal law, no unsolicited mail which is harmful to


minors pursuant to as defined in Section 1040.75 of this title shall


be mailed to any person. The party mailing the materials specified


in this section may be indicted and tried in any county wherein such


material is deposited or delivered, or in which it is received by


the person to whom it is addressed.


B. Any person who violates any provision of this section


involving obscene materials or unlawful pornography, upon


conviction, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished


by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than one (1) year,


or by a fine of not less than Two Thousand Dollars ($2,000.00), or


by both such fine and imprisonment.


C. Any person who violates any provision of this section


involving child sexual abuse material, upon conviction, shall be


guilty of a Class B2 felony offense and shall be punished by


imprisonment in the custody of the Department of Corrections for not


less than three (3) years and not more than twenty (20) years, or by


a fine of not less than Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00), or by


both such fine and imprisonment. Any person convicted of a second

Req. No. 3485 Page 10


or subsequent violation shall, upon conviction, be punished by


imprisonment in the custody of the Department of Corrections for not


less than ten (10) years and not more than thirty (30) years, or by


a fine of not less than Twenty Thousand Dollars ($20,000.00), or by


both such fine and imprisonment. The violator, upon conviction,


shall be required to register as a sex offender under the Sex


Offenders Registration Act.


SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1040.8a of Title 21, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


Any internet service provider that provides internet access to


customers in this state shall implement filtering technology that


prevents any person from accessing child sexual abuse material,


obscene materials, or unlawful pornography as defined in Section


1024.1 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


SECTION 5. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3485 CN 1/15/2026 9:24:49 AM













Req. No. 3485 Page 11